Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-468
Onsite vaccinations for influenza
and pneumococcal disease.

In order to prevent, detect, and
control pneumonia and influenza outbreaks in Nebraska, each general acute
hospital, intermediate care facility, nursing facility, and skilled nursing
facility shall annually, beginning no later than October 1 and ending on the
following April 1, offer
onsite vaccinations for influenza and pneumococcal disease to all residents
and to all inpatients prior to discharge, pursuant to procedures of the facility
and in accordance with the recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization
practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United
States Public Health Service of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services as the recommendations existed on January 1, 2012. This section shall not apply in individual
cases when contraindicated or if a national shortage of the vaccine exists. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to require any facility listed in this
section to cover the cost of a vaccination provided pursuant to this section.

Laws 2012, LB1077, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB859, § 2.